Texas, session 891, HB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 23.013, Tax Code, is amended by adding Subsection (f) to read as follows: (f)  Notwithstanding Section 1.04(7), in determining the market value of a residence homestead that is more than 30 years old and located in a tax increment financing reinvestment zone designated by a municipality under Chapter 311 or in the area adjacent to the zone, the chief appraiser for the appraisal district in which the property is located may, as the chief appraiser considers appropriate to fairly appraise the property, exclude from consideration the value of new or substantially remodeled residential properties that are located in the same neighborhood as the residence homestead being appraised and that would otherwise be considered in appraising the residence homestead. For purposes of this subsection, an area adjacent to a tax increment financing reinvestment zone means any area within two miles of the zone's boundaries in any direction that is not located within the boundaries of another reinvestment zone. SECTION 2.  This Act applies only to the appraisal for ad valorem tax purposes of a residence homestead for a tax year that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026, but only if the constitutional amendment authorizing the legislature to provide that the officials responsible for appraising property for ad valorem taxation in a county may exclude from consideration the value of new or substantially remodeled residential property when determining the market value of an older residence homestead located in or near a tax increment financing reinvestment zone is approved by the voters. If that amendment is not approved by the voters, this Act has no effect.